North Carolina statutes. Chapter 95. Department of Labor and Labor Regulations.
Article 7B. Historical Boilers.

§ 95-69.30.
Safety Program for Operators and Apprentices.

The Department of Labor shall create and conduct a safety program for the purpose of providing instruction on how to properly care, maintain, operate, and exhibit historical boilers. The program shall also include instruction on how to train an apprentice to properly care, maintain, operate, and exhibit historical boilers. For purposes of this section, the term “historical boiler” means a steam boiler of riveted construction that is preserved, restored, or maintained for hobby or demonstration.

History.

2013-360, s. 13.10(a).